California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22284.

A district may prescribe by rule that when any charges fixed for services under Section 22280 become delinquent, the charges may be collected in accordance with procedures specified in Section 25806.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1052, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Supervision by Department [22335. - 22338.]

22335.

During the construction of any works of a district to be paid for out of the proceeds of any bond issue, the department shall have access to all plans, specifications, and records of the construction and shall from time to time make any investigations and reports to the board the department deems to be in the interest of the public or of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

22336.

During the construction of any work to be paid for out of the proceeds of the sale of any bonds of any district, the secretary shall within one week after each regular meeting of the board forward to the department copies of all reports made to the board as to the progress of the work and a statement of the amounts paid for any part of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22337.

The board immediately after the publication of the statement of the financial condition of the district each year shall send all of the following papers to the department, which shall examine them and report to the board any suggestions it deems proper:

(a) A copy of the financial statement.

(b) A report stating the general condition of any works constructed or acquired by the district.

(c) A statement of whether or not the plan of irrigation adopted by the district is being successfully carried out.

(d) A statement of any other matters which the board deems proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22338.

The department may at any time make an examination of the affairs of any district or call upon the authorities of the district for any information it desires and make any report thereon it deems advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Property [22425. - 22561.]



  ARTICLE 1. Acquisition of Property [22425. - 22438.]

22425.

A district may acquire by any means any property or interest in property to carry out its purposes, including any of the following:

(a) Property for the construction, improvement, and operation of works in this state or in any other state or in a foreign nation.

(b) Works being constructed.

(c) Stock of domestic or foreign corporations owning water, water rights, canals, water works, franchises, concessions, or rights.

(d) Works by which land has been or may be supplied with water for irrigation. 

(e) Property not otherwise authorized herein that may be required as a condition to obtaining state financial assistance for local projects as set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 12880), of Part 6, Division 6, of the Water Code.

(f) Public buildings and grounds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

22426.

Any property necessary for the purposes of the district may be acquired by the district and held subject to any liens, incumbrances, or obligations on it at the time of its acquisition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22427.

If any road, railroad, canal, or other property subject or devoted to public use will become subject to flooding or other interference by reason of the construction or proposed construction of any works of a district, the district may acquire the right to flood or otherwise interfere with the property, whether or not it is publicly or privately owned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22428.

If by a judgment or agreement a district is required to relocate any road, railroad, canal, or other property subject or devoted to public use, the district may acquire all property necessary to comply with the agreement or judgment and make conveyances of the relocated road, railroad, canal, or other property to comply with the agreement or judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22429.

The right is hereby granted to locate, construct, and maintain any of the works of a district on any land which is now or hereafter owned by the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22430.

There is given, dedicated, and set apart for the uses and purposes of each district all water and water rights belonging to this State within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22431.

A district may construct any works across any watercourse, road, railway, conduit, or other property subject or devoted to public use in a manner that will afford security to life and property. The district shall restore the property crossed as near as may be to its former state or so as not to have impaired unnecessarily its usefulness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22432.

A district may on terms its board deems for the best interests of the district take a deed or release from any claimant, including any other taxing or assessing agency, to any interest in any property owned or claimed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22433.

A district may purchase pursuant to law property tax sold or tax deeded to the State on which the district has a claim, lien, or deed for unpaid assessments or any right, title, interest, or claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22434.

Any district when it appears to its board to be for the best interest of the district may discharge with or without compromise any overlapping tax or assessment liens equal or superior in rank to those of the district existing on any property to which the district has title and may purchase any outstanding tax or assessment titles existing on the property equal or superior in rank to the title of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.

A district may notwithstanding any other provisions of this division use any of its funds to carry out the provisions of Section 22434 and may with these funds purchase written evidences of indebtedness of overlapping taxing or assessing agencies for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22436.

A district may in its name take conveyances, leases, contracts, or other assurances for all property acquired by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22437.

The title to all property acquired by a district is held in trust for its uses and purposes. The district may hold, use, acquire, manage, sell, or lease the property as provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22438.

(a) A district which is the owner of an easement for an open canal or other water conveyance facility for the transportation of water across lands not owned by the district, other than an easement evidenced by a written grant or judgment providing a legal description of the easement, has a secondary easement on each side of the open canal or other water conveyance facility for the maintenance, repair, cleaning, operation, and control of the open canal or other water conveyance facility and other use as may reasonably be required by the district in exercising those rights and in the maintenance, repair, cleaning, and operation of that easement and open canal or other water conveyance facility with equipment owned by, or available to, the district for that use at the time the rights are exercised. The duration of the secondary easement shall be for as long as the district, or its successors or assigns, continues to own the open canal or other water conveyance facility easement regardless of what use has or has not been made of the secondary easement. 

(b) The owner or any lessee of the land upon which a secondary easement is located may use the surface of the land upon which the secondary easement is located for his or her own purposes to the extent that use does not unreasonably interfere with the district’s ownership or use of the secondary easement or the open canal or other water conveyance facility easement. Any encroachment or obstruction placed or permitted upon the secondary easement by the owner or any lessee of the land, which unreasonably interferes with the secondary easement or the open canal or other water conveyance facility easement, may be removed by the district at the owner’s or lessee’s expense, or by legal action filed by the district. 

(c) This section shall not be construed to limit the right of a district or of any person to acquire any easement by prescription or condemnation or to enter into a written agreement concerning an easement or secondary easement upon terms agreed to by the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 454, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Eminent Domain [22456. - 22458.]

22456.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary to carry out its purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

22457.

If the owner of any land, easement, or franchise to be crossed by works of a district can not agree with the district as to payment, location of the crossing, or any other matters in connection therewith, they shall be determined as in a proceeding in eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22458.

If a right to flood or otherwise interfere with any road, railroad, canal, or other property is acquired by eminent domain, the judgment may, if the court finds that the public convenience requires it, direct the district to relocate the road, railroad, canal, or other property in accordance with plans prescribed by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Power Lines on Public Property [22475. - 22478.]

22475.

There is granted to every district the right to construct and operate in a manner affording security for life and property electric light and power lines along, over, under, or upon any road or across any railway or conduit which the route of the lines intersects or runs along.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22476.

A district may not construct and operate electric light and power lines along, over, under, or upon any road within any city unless permission to do so is granted by the governing body of the city, which in so doing may impose reasonable conditions upon the proposed use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22477.

Permission pursuant to Section 22476 is not necessary where the road to be used is a convenient part of the route of the lines and at the time construction of the lines was commenced or the plans for them were adopted was located in territory not within an organized city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22478.

A district constructing lines pursuant to this article shall restore the road, railway, or conduit intersected to its former state of usefulness as near as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disposition of Property [22500. - 22506.]

22500.

When a board determines by resolution entered upon the minutes that any property of the district is no longer necessary for district purposes, the district may for a valuable consideration sell or lease the property upon terms that appear to the board to be for the best interests of the district. Sales and leases authorized under this section include sales and leases to the State and to cities, counties, districts and other political subdivisions of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------

22501.

A district may lease the right to produce any minerals or hydrocarbons in any property held by it upon the terms the board deems most beneficial to the district after the board has found by a resolution entered in its minutes that the lease may be carried out without interfering with the use of the property for district purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22502.

All conveyances and leases of district property shall be executed by the secretary and president on behalf of the district in accordance with a resolution of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22503.

A district may sell, convey, lease, give and take options and contracts of sale upon, and otherwise deal with property acquired by it through a collector’s deed, including sale to a former owner or holder, on terms and at a price approved by its board. Instruments to accomplish the same shall be executed and acknowledged by the president and secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22505.

A district may lease any of its property to the State of California, a public agency of the State, a city, county, district, or other political subdivision of the State, whenever such a lease will benefit the district. Property may be so leased for monetary consideration or other benefit to the district without publishing notice or receiving bids if the board, by resolution entered upon its minutes, determines that the leasing is for the best interests of the district and will not interfere with the use of the property by the district for district purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------

22506.

When a board determines by resolution entered upon the minutes that any property of the district may be leased for a use or purpose that will not interfere with or be inconsistent with district uses or purposes, the district may, for a valuable consideration, lease the property for such use or purpose upon terms that appear to the board to be for the best interests of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 204.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Lease of Works [22525. - 22530.]

22525.

This article provides an independent method of leasing and its provisions apply only to leases made pursuant to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22526.

A district may lease part or all of its works whenever the leasing will benefit the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22527.

When the board contemplates the leasing of the works of the district, it shall give notice thereof at least three weeks prior to the making of the lease, by publication at least once in some newspaper published in the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22528.

The lease shall be made to the highest bidder, but any and all bids may be rejected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22529.

The lease shall not interfere with any prior rights established by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22530.

A good and sufficient bond shall be required by the board to secure the faithful performance of the lease by the lessees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Water Leases for Mechanical Purposes [22550. - 22561.]

22550.

The provisions of this article apply only to leases made pursuant to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22551.

Whenever a district in the development of its works has the opportunity without increased expenditure to lease for mechanical purposes not inconsistent with the district’s purposes the use of water controlled by it, it may do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22552.

Whenever the board desires to lease the use of water it shall pass a resolution of intention to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22553.

Immediately after the passage of the resolution the secretary shall give notice of the intention, by publication for at least 20 days in one newspaper published in each affected county if a newspaper is published in it, and, if not, in any newspaper the board selects, and if the board thinks proper, in any other newspapers the board selects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22554.

The notice of intention to lease the use of water shall state all of the following:

(a) The board will receive sealed proposals for the lease.

(b) The lease will be let to the highest responsible bidder.

(c) The time and place of opening the proposals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22555.

At the time and place appointed the board shall open in public the proposals to lease the use of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22556.

As soon after opening the proposals as may be convenient the board may let the lease in portions or as a whole to the highest responsible bidder or may reject any or all proposals and readvertise for proposals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22557.

The rental accruing upon a lease of the use of water may vary from year to year as specified in the lease and shall be payable semi-annually on the thirtieth day of December and thirtieth day of June of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22558.

If at any time the rental is not paid on the day fixed, the amount of the rental due shall be doubled, and if not paid within the next succeeding 90 days, the lease shall be forfeited to the district, together with any and all works constructed, owned, used, or controlled by the lessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22559.

All money collected on a lease shall be paid into the district treasury and be apportioned to any funds the board deems advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22560.

Upon the letting of any lease, the board may require the lessee to execute a bond for the faithful performance of the covenants of the lease or give such other guaranty of good faith as in its judgment may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22561.

The lease may be for a period not exceeding 25 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Controversies [22650. - 22762.]



  ARTICLE 1. Actions and Proceedings [22650. - 22655.]

22650.

A district may commence and maintain any actions and proceedings to carry out its purposes or protect its interests and may defend in any action or proceeding brought against it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22651.

In all actions or proceedings the board may sue, appear, and defend in person or by attorneys and in the name of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22651.5.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), any judicial action or proceeding against a district to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul an ordinance, resolution, or motion fixing or changing a rate or charge for an electric commodity or an electric service furnished by the district and adopted on or after July 1, 2000, shall be commenced within 120 days of the effective date of that ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(b) The statute of limitations specified in subdivision (a) does not apply to any judicial action or proceeding filed pursuant to Chapter 13.7 (commencing with Section 54999) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code to protest or challenge a rate or charge or to seek the refund of a capital facilities fee if the notice and disclosure requirements of Section 54999.35 of the Government Code have not been followed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 146, Sec. 8.   Effective July 21, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22652.

Service of summons upon a district may be made by serving it upon either the secretary or a majority of the directors elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22653.

Before an action or proceeding by the holders of bonds of a district to compel or restrain the doing of an act by the district or its board may be commenced or maintained, the holders of 10 per cent or more of the outstanding bonds of the district shall join in the action or proceeding as plaintiffs, petitioners, or applicants for the relief sought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22654.

A district may commence, maintain, intervene in, compromise, and assume the costs of any action or proceeding involving or affecting the ownership or use of waters or water rights within the district used or useful for any purpose of the district or of benefit to any land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

22655.

A district may commence, maintain, intervene in, defend, and compromise actions and proceedings to prevent interference with or diminution of the natural flow of any stream or natural or artificially created subterranean supply of waters which may:

(a) Be used or be useful for any purpose of the district.

(b) Be of common benefit to the land or its inhabitants.

(c) Endanger the inhabitants or the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 227.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Validating Proceedings [22670. - 22670.]

22670.

An action to determine the validity of any contract entered into for a period of more than three years or the levy of any assessment or of bonds, including whether or not the bonds when delivered to the person entitled to them under the terms of a contract will or do constitute valid obligations of the district as against all persons, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 740, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Limitations [22700. - 22701.]

22700.

No contest of any thing or matter herein provided shall be made other than in the time and manner herein specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22701.

In any such action all findings of fact or conclusions of a board or board of supervisors upon all matters shall be conclusive unless the action was instituted within six months after the finding or conclusion was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Public Liability [22727. - 22727.]

22727.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Settlement of Damages to Water Rights of State Land [22750. - 22762.]

22750.

In all controversies involving any damage to any and all water rights of any land which is heretofore or hereafter tax-sold or tax-deeded to the State, the State disclaims any interest in the controversy and authorizes the district within which the land is situated to make a final settlement of the controversy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22751.

The damages claimed in a controversy defined by this article are those occurring prior to the execution of the tax deed to the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22752.

The money collected in the settlement pursuant to this article shall be paid into the treasury of the district for district purposes and be apportioned to any funds the board deems advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22753.

The settlement of a controversy defined by this article shall be upon terms satisfactory to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22754.

The tax title of the State to the land involved remains wholly unimpaired by proceedings had pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22762.

An action to determine the validity of the Quantification Settlement Agreement defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Chapter 617 of the Statutes of 2002, or any action regarding a contract entered into that implements, or is referenced in, that Quantification Settlement Agreement, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 314.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Provisions Pertaining Only to 500,000-Acre Districts [22825. - 22970.35.]



  ARTICLE 1. Introduction [22825. - 22826.]

22825.

The provisions of this chapter apply only to districts containing 500,000 acres or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22826.

Except as provided in this chapter every district containing 500,000 acres or more shall be governed by the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Internal Organization [22840. - 22849.]

22840.

(a) Each director of a district may receive a salary fixed by an ordinance that is subject to referendum and adopted by the board in an amount that does not exceed the salary of a member of the Imperial County Board of Supervisors.

(b) The adoption of an ordinance pursuant to subdivision (a) is subject to Sections 20203, 20204, 20205, 20206, and 20207.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 427, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

22840.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may elect a chairperson from its members and may elect, in addition to a chairperson, a vice chairperson who shall have the power to perform all the duties of the chairperson in the absence of the chairperson, or in the event of his or her inability to perform those duties. If the board elects a chairperson or vice chairperson, any reference to president or vice president in any provision of this division, other than this chapter, means the chairperson or vice chairperson of the board. The board may, in this case, designate a chief staff person to be known as the president.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22841.

Notwithstanding Section 1304 of the Elections Code, the board of an irrigation district containing 500,000 acres or more may designate that the general district election shall be held on the day provided for the statewide direct primary election in Section 1201 of the Elections Code and consolidated with the statewide primary election, and thereafter all references to odd-numbered years with respect to those elections shall mean even-numbered years as nearly as may be applicable. A designation by the board changing the date of a general district election pursuant to this section shall be adopted by resolution of the board and filed with the county clerk of the principal county at least 90 days before the date of the next district general election that would occur had the designation not been made and at least 90 days before the next statewide direct primary election provided for in Section 1201 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 231.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

22841.5.

In an irrigation district containing 500,000 acres or more, the board shall, when changing the boundaries of the divisions of the district pursuant to Section 21605, make such boundaries coincide with general county election precincts as nearly as may be practicable while keeping such divisions as nearly equal in population as may be practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 195.)
-------------------------------------------

22842.

The board may:

(a) Provide for and create divisions or departments for management and operating purposes.

(b) Appoint department heads.

(c) Classify and reclassify employees.

(d) Fix the duties, terms, and time of employment.

(e) Provide for and fix salaries, compensation, and expenses of department heads, executives, and employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

22843.

All department heads, executives, and employees shall hold their employment at the will of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22844.

The board shall:

(a) Elect an assessor and a collector, and on and after 12 p.m. on December 31, 1971, elect a treasurer, each of whom shall hold office at the pleasure of the board.

(b) Fix and alter their respective compensations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

22845.

The treasurer, assessor, and collector shall each qualify by taking and filing with the secretary the oath of office and shall give a bond to the district as required by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

22846.

The bond of the collector shall be in the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more and shall be executed at the expense of the district by a surety company authorized to do business in the state, except if the gross revenue estimated by the board to be received by such district during the fiscal year does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), in which case the bond of the collector may be the sum of such estimated gross annual revenue of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 538.)
-------------------------------------------

22846.5.

The bond of the treasurer shall be in a sum determined pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 21140) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

22847.

The board may:

(a) Appoint one person to hold the offices of assessor, treasurer, and collector.

(b) Segregate the offices and appoint a person to fill each office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

22848.

The same person may hold the office of president, secretary, treasurer, assessor, and collector, or any of those offices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

22849.

The board of supervisors of the office county shall fill by appointment vacancies in the offices of directors, provided that any such appointed directors shall be required to run for election in the next succeeding general district election.

If within 60 days after a vacancy on the board of directors occurs the board of supervisors has failed to fill such vacancy, a special election may be called by the board of directors and held in the division affected, for the purpose of filling such vacancy. In the event there are more than two candidates at such special election, only a plurality will be required for election. The candidate elected at such special election shall fill the unexpired term of the vacating director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Flood Protection [22875. - 22879.]

22875.

Any district may expend sums that seem necessary to its board for the protection of its canal system or of land from damage by flood and the overflow of rivers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22876.

The district may contribute funds for the purpose stated in Section 22875 to be expended by or jointly with the United States, other governments, or persons benefited by the same protective works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22877.

A district may do all things necessary to insure its canal system and the land from any damage by flood or overflow without holding an election to authorize the expenditure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22878.

When the issuance of bonds by any district has been authorized by the voters for the purpose of protection against floods but the bonds have not been sold, the district may borrow for that purpose to the amount of the bond issue unsold at a rate of interest not exceeding 7 per cent per year. When the bonds have been sold, the amount borrowed under the provisions of this section shall be repaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

22879.

In addition to the powers conferred by Section 22878 any district may borrow for flood protection purposes in any one year not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) at a rate of interest not exceeding 7 per cent per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Assessments [22950. - 22950.]

22950.

Every district by its board, each year within 15 days after the close of its session as a board of equalization, shall levy an assessment sufficient to raise all of the following:

(a) Annual interest on any outstanding bonds of the district except to the extent that provision is otherwise made as permitted by law.

(b) Principal of outstanding bonds of the district as they mature except to the extent that provision is otherwise made as permitted by law.

(c) Obligations of the district due or to become due within the succeeding 12 months except to the extent that provision is otherwise made as permitted by law.

(d) A sum which with the other revenue of the district will meet the estimated current expenses of the district for the succeeding 12 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 532.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous Provisions [22960. - 22961.]

22960.

Every district by its board may, in addition to other powers, borrow funds for any lawful purpose at an interest rate not exceeding 5 per cent per year and issue warrants therefor payable at future dates. No election authorizing such borrowing or issuance of warrants need be held but the principal amount of such indebtedness unpaid at any time shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 686.)
-------------------------------------------

22961.

A reserve fund from assessments or other revenues for emergencies, replacements or other lawful purpose of the district may be provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 686.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Runoff Elections [22970. - 22970.35.]

22970.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code, in the event that in an irrigation district containing 500,000 acres or more there are three or more candidates for an elective office and at the general district election no one candidate for the elective office secures a majority of the votes cast, a runoff election shall be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 232.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.5.

The runoff election shall be held on the last Tuesday in November, next following the general election, between the two candidates who secure the greatest number of votes for the elective office at the general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.10.

The governing body shall certify the two candidates who receive the highest number of votes for the elective office to the county elections official as the candidates in the runoff election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.15.

The voters qualified to vote for the elective offices at the preceding general district election shall be the only voters qualified for the runoff election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.20.

Not less than seven days before any runoff election, any voter entitled to vote by vote by mail ballot as provided in Section 10530 of the Elections Code may file with the county elections official, either in person or by mail, his or her written application for a vote by mail ballot. Vote by mail voting shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Section 10530 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 547, Sec. 6.   (AB 1572)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.25.

The county elections official shall commence the canvass of the returns on the first Wednesday after each runoff election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 156.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.30.

Not later than the second Friday in December next following the runoff election, the governing body at a regular or special meeting shall declare elected the candidate receiving the majority of the votes cast for that office at the runoff election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.32.

Officers elected at a runoff election shall take office pursuant to Section 21101.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

22970.35.

In all other respects a runoff election shall be conducted in the same manner as the general election for that office held pursuant to the Uniform District Election Law, insofar as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Provisions Pertaining Only to the El Dorado Irrigation District [22975. - 22977.]

22975.
